test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-soomm_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - šoomm e-stem humina: # Noun - full paradigm
     šoomm+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: šoomm
     šoomm+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: šoom
     šoomm+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: šoom
     šoomm+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: šummu
     šoomm+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: šoomast
     šoomm+N+Sg+Com+Indef: šoomain
     šoomm+N+Ess+Indef: šoomman
     šoomm+N+Par+Indef: šoommad
     šoomm+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [šoomtaa, šoomtää]
     šoomm+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: šoom
     šoomm+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: šoomai
     šoomm+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: šoomaid
     šoomm+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: šoomaid
     šoomm+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: šoomain
     šoomm+N+Pl+Com+Indef: šoomaivuiʹm
     šoomm+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [šoomaitaa, šoomaitää]
